Colorado statutes. TITLE 26.5 Early Childhood Programs and Services
PART 1
COLORADO CHILD CARE ASSISTANCE PROGRAM

26.5-4-101. Short title.

The short title of this part 1 is the "Colorado Child Care Assistance Program Act".

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 660, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-2-801 as it existed prior to 2022.

26.5-4-102. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that:

The state's policies in connection with the provision of child care assistance and the effective delivery of such assistance are critical to the ultimate success of any welfare reform program;

Children in low-income families who receive services through a child care assistance program need and deserve the same access to a broad range of child care providers as do children in families who do not need assistance;

It is critical to provide low- to moderate-income families with access to high-quality, affordable child care that fosters healthy child development and school readiness, while at the same time promotes family self-sufficiency and attachment to the workforce; and

Individual counties play a vital role in administering the child care assistance program and have local knowledge of their individual community needs.

Therefore, the general assembly hereby finds and declares that it is in the best interests of the state to:

Adopt the Colorado child care assistance program set forth in this part 1;

Adopt a consistent, statewide plan for child care provider reimbursement rates with a goal of payment rates that adequately cover the cost of quality child care to facilitate and increase access to high-quality child care for low-income families;

Achieve parity across counties in the state with regard to the CCCAP program and funding allocation.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 660, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-2-802 as it existed prior to 2022.

26.5-4-103. Definitions.

As used in this part 1, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Child care assistance program" or "CCCAP" means the public assistance program for child care known as the Colorado child care assistance program established in this part 1.

"Colorado universal preschool program" means the state preschool program established in part 2 of this article 4.

"County department" means the county or district department of human or social services.

"Early care and education provider" means a school district or provider that is licensed pursuant to part 3 of article 5 of this title 26.5 or that participates in the Colorado preschool program pursuant to article 28 of title 22, as it exists prior to July 1, 2023, or the Colorado universal preschool program pursuant to part 2 of this article 4.

"Enrollment contract" means a contractual agreement directly with a provider or network that assures a specified number of child care service enrollments will be made available to serve a specified number of children who qualify for child care assistance. Enrollment contracts are an allowable use of federal child care funds.

"Head start program" means a program operated by a local public or private nonprofit agency designated by the federal department of health and human services to operate a head start program pursuant to the provisions of Title V of the federal "Economic Opportunity Act of 1964", as amended.

"High-quality early childhood program" means a program that is operated by a provider with a fiscal agreement through CCCAP and that is in the top three levels of the state's quality rating and improvement system, is accredited by a department-approved accrediting body, or is an early head start or head start program that meets federal standards.

"Participant" means a participant, as defined in section 26-2-703 (15), in the Colorado works program.

"Provider" means a child care provider licensed pursuant to part 3 of article 5 of this title 26.5 that has an agreement or enrollment contract to participate in the child care assistance program.

"Recipient" means an individual or a family who is receiving or has received benefits from the Colorado child care assistance program pursuant to the provisions of this part 1.

"Regular provider reimbursement rate" means the base rate paid for child care and excludes any additional payment for additional fees that are included in the reimbursement paid to providers.

"Works program" means the Colorado works program established pursuant to part 7 of article 2 of title 26.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 660, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-2-802.5 as it existed prior to 2022.

26.5-4-104. Colorado child care assistance program - department authority - cooperation with federal government - acceptance and administration of money.

The department is the sole state agency for administering the state plan for the Colorado child care assistance program. The department, under the supervision of the executive director, shall administer and supervise the Colorado child care assistance program, which program is declared to be a state as well as a county purpose.

The department may accept on behalf of the state of Colorado the provisions and benefits of acts of congress designed to provide money or other property for the Colorado child care assistance program, which money or other property is designated for purposes within the function of the department, and may accept on behalf of the state any offers that have been or may from time to time be made of money or other property by any persons, agencies, or entities for the Colorado child care assistance program, which money or other property is designated for purposes within the function of the state department; except that, unless otherwise expressly provided by law, the department shall not accept said money or other property unless the department has recommended acceptance to and received the written approval of the governor and the attorney general. Approval of the governor and the attorney general authorizes the acceptance of the money or property in accordance with the restrictions and conditions and for the purposes for which the money or property is intended.

The state treasurer is designated as ex officio custodian of all money that the department receives pursuant to this subsection (2) from the federal government and from any other source for which the approval required in subsection (2)(a) of this section is obtained.

The state treasurer shall hold money received pursuant to this subsection (2) separate and distinct from state money and is authorized to make disbursements of the money for the designated purpose or for administrative costs, which may be provided in grants, upon warrants issued by the state controller upon the voucher of the department.

The department shall cooperate with the federal department of health and human services and other federal agencies in any reasonable manner, in conformity with the laws of this state, which may be necessary to qualify for federal aid, including the preparation of state plans, the making of reports in such form and containing such information as a federal agency may from time to time require, and the compliance with such provisions as the federal government may from time to time find necessary to assure the correctness and verification of the reports.

In administering money appropriated or made available to the department for the Colorado child care assistance program, the department is authorized to:

Require as a condition for receiving grants-in-aid that each county in this state bear the proportion of the total expense of furnishing child care assistance as is fixed by law;

Terminate grants-in-aid to a county of this state if the county does not comply with the laws and rules providing the grants-in-aid and the minimum standards prescribed by department rules;

Undertake immediately the administration of child care assistance within a county of this state that has had any or all of its grants-in-aid terminated pursuant to subsection (4)(b) of this section; except that the county shall continue to meet the requirements of subsection (4)(a) of this section;

Recover any money owed by a county to the state by reducing the amount of any payments due from the state in connection with CCCAP; and

Take any other action that may be necessary or desirable for carrying out the provisions of this part 1.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 662, § 3, effective July 1.

26.5-4-105. Colorado child care assistance program - department duties.

In addition to any other duties specified in this part 1, the department, under the supervision of the executive director, shall:

Administer or supervise the establishment, extension, and strengthening of the Colorado child care assistance program in cooperation with the federal department of health and human services and other state or federal agencies;

Provide services to county departments, including the organization and supervision of county departments for the effective administration of CCCAP, as set out in department rules as to program scope and content, including provision of child care assistance and compilation of statistics and necessary information relative to child care assistance;

Prescribe forms necessary for applications, reports, affidavits, and such other forms as it may deem necessary and advisable;

Cooperate with other departments, agencies, and institutions of the state and federal governments in the performance of activities in conformity with the purposes of this part 1; and

Act as the agent of the federal government in activities related to the Colorado child care assistance program in matters of mutual concern in conformity with this part 1 and in the administration of any federal money granted to the state to aid in the furtherance of CCCAP.

The department may review any decision of a county department and may consider any application for child care assistance upon which a decision has not been made by the county department within a reasonable time to determine the propriety of the action or failure to take timely action on an application for child care assistance. The department shall make such additional investigation as it deems necessary and shall, after giving the county department an opportunity to rebut any findings or conclusions of the department that the action or delay in taking action was a violation of or contrary to department rules, make such decision as to the granting of child care assistance and the amount thereof as in its opinion is justifiable pursuant to the provisions of this part 1 and department rules. Applicants or recipients affected by the decisions of the department, upon request, shall be given reasonable notice and opportunity for a fair hearing by the department.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 663, § 3, effective July 1.

26.5-4-106. Applications for child care assistance - verification - award - not assignable - limitation.

An individual wishing to apply for child care assistance may do so, and the assistance shall be furnished with reasonable promptness to each eligible individual in accordance with department rules.

The department rules may provide for a simplified application in order that child care assistance may be furnished to eligible persons as soon as possible and shall provide adequate safeguards and controls to ensure that only eligible persons receive child care assistance under this part 1. The unified application that the department develops pursuant to section 26.5-1-110 must at some point include application for child care assistance through CCCAP.

A person seeking child care assistance must submit an application in accordance with department rule, and the department shall ensure that the application is routed to the applicant's county of residence. An application for child care assistance must:

Be in writing or reduced to writing in the manner and upon the form prescribed by the department;

Include the name, age, and residence of the applicant and a statement of the amount of property, both real and personal, in which the applicant has an interest and of all income the applicant may have at the time of the filing of the application, and such other information as may be required by department rule; and

Be verified by the signature of the applicant.

When a county department receives an application for child care assistance, it shall promptly make a record concerning the circumstances of the applicant to verify the facts supporting the application and shall examine all pertinent records and shall make a diligent effort to examine all records prior to granting assistance. The county department shall also verify such other information as may be required by department rule.

In verifying an application received pursuant to this section, the county department shall confirm that the applicant meets the eligibility requirements for receiving public assistance specified in section 26-2-111 (1).

If the information is reasonably available, the county department shall complete the verification before approving or continuing child care assistance.

Within ten working days after the county department discovers a discrepancy relating to a fraudulent or suspected fraudulent act affecting eligibility, the county department shall refer the matter to the appropriate investigatory agency for investigation. The investigatory agency shall take action within thirty days following receipt of the information from the county department.

The county department, the department, and the officers and authorized employees of each may conduct visits to the home of the applicant at reasonable times, make investigations and require the attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production of books, records, and papers by subpoena, and make application to the district court to compel and enforce such attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production of such books, records, and papers. Officers and employees designated by the county department or the department may administer oaths and affirmations.

Upon completion of the verification and record of each application for child care assistance, the county department, pursuant to department rules, shall determine whether the applicant is eligible for child care assistance, the amount of child care assistance to be granted, and the beginning date of the assistance. In determining the amount of child care assistance to be granted, the county department shall take due account, pursuant to department rules, of any income or property available to the applicant and any support, either in cash or in kind, that the applicant may receive from other sources.

When the eligibility, amount, and date for beginning child care assistance have been established, the county department shall make an award to or on behalf of the applicant in accordance with department rules, which award is binding on the county and shall be complied with by the county until it is modified or vacated. The county department shall at once notify the applicant and the department, in writing, of its decisions on child care assistance and the reasons for those decisions.

A county department shall not deny child care assistance for a person who is otherwise qualified to receive child care assistance by reason of the fact that:

The person is the owner of real estate occupied by the person as a residence; or

The person is the owner of personal property that is exempt by the laws of Colorado from execution or attachment.

The executive director by rule may establish limitations on the value of real and personal property and other resources, not included in subsection (4)(a) of this section, that may be available to an applicant or recipient without affecting eligibility for child care assistance.

For child care assistance purposes, the value of residential or other real property is equal to the actual value of the property, as determined by the county assessor pursuant to article 1 of title 39.

A county department shall not require a person, as a condition of receiving child care assistance, to repay or promise to repay the state of Colorado any money properly paid to the person as child care assistance pursuant to the provisions of this part 1 and department rules or as public assistance pursuant to article 2 of title 26 and the rules of the state department of human services.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 664, § 3, effective July 1.

26.5-4-107. Reconsideration and changes.

A county department shall reconsider child care assistance awarded pursuant to this part 1 as frequently as and in the manner required by department rules. After such further verification and record as the county department may deem necessary or department rules may require, the amount of child care assistance provided may be changed, or child care assistance may be terminated, if the department or the county department finds that the recipient's circumstances have altered sufficiently to warrant such action or if changes in state or federal law have been made that would warrant such action.

In accordance with department rules, a county department may terminate child care assistance at any time for cause, or it may, for cause, suspend child care assistance for such period as it may deem proper. Timely notice to persons who are receiving child care assistance, but who are not eligible due to fraudulent acts, may be given five days before the date of a proposed action, in accordance with federal regulations.

Whenever child care assistance is terminated, suspended, or in any way changed, the county department shall at once report the decision to the recipient and to the department, setting forth the reason for the action. All such decisions are subject to review by the department in accordance with department rules.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 666, § 3, effective July 1.

26.5-4-108. Appeals.

If a county department does not act on an application for child care assistance within a reasonable time after the application is filed, or if a county department denies an application in whole or in part, or if a county department suspends, terminates, or modifies a grant of child care assistance, the applicant or recipient, as the case may be, may appeal to the department in the manner and form prescribed by department rules. Every county department shall adopt procedures for the resolution of disputes arising between the county department and an applicant for or recipient of child care assistance prior to appeal to the department. The procedures are referred to in this section as the "dispute resolution process". Two or more counties may jointly establish the dispute resolution process. The dispute resolution process must be consistent with department rules. The dispute resolution process must include an opportunity for all clients to have a county conference, upon the applicant's or recipient's request. This requirement may be met through a telephonic conference upon the agreement of the applicant or recipient and the county department. The dispute resolution process need not conform to the requirements of section 24-4-105, as long as the department rules include provisions specifically setting forth expeditious time frames, notice, and an opportunity to be heard and to present information. If the dispute is not resolved, the applicant or recipient may appeal to the department in the manner and form prescribed by department rules. County notices to applicants or recipients must inform them of the basis for the county's decision or action and must inform them of their rights to a county conference under the dispute resolution process and of their rights to state-level appeal and the process for making the appeal.

Upon receipt of an appeal, the department shall give the appellant reasonable notice and an opportunity for a fair hearing in accordance with department rules. The hearing must comply with section 24-4-105, and an administrative law judge must preside.

The appellant must have an opportunity to examine all applications and pertinent records concerning the appellant that constitute a basis for the denial, suspension, termination, or modification of child care assistance.

The appellant may represent himself or herself or may be represented by legal counsel, or by a relative, friend, or other spokesperson. Representation by a nonlawyer in this circumstance does not constitute the practice of law.

All decisions of the department are binding on the county department involved, and the county department shall comply with said decisions.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 666, § 3, effective July 1.

26.5-4-109. Provider rates - provider recruitment.

No later than July 1, 2025, and at least every three years thereafter, the department, in consultation with county departments and child care providers, shall develop the calculation of provider rates with the goal of eventually ensuring the provider rates more accurately reflect the cost of child care rather than families' ability to pay. The department may contract for assistance in developing the calculation. The calculation must account for the cost of quality care and may vary by age group, region, and type of care. The department must ensure that the calculation of provider rates complies with federal regulations and, if required by federal law, must obtain approval before changing the calculation of or process for setting the provider rates. Before adopting a change to the provider rates or other payment policies, the department, in consultation with the county departments and providers, shall analyze the anticipated impact of the change to the Colorado child care assistance program, including the impact on the costs of services and on the families and providers that participate in CCCAP. The department shall include an analysis completed pursuant to this subsection (1)(a) in the report described in section 26.5-4-114.

As soon as practicable following July 1, 2022, but no later than October 1, 2022, the executive director shall convene a working group of county departments and providers to discuss provider rates and the provider rate calculation described in subsection (1)(a) of this section.

The department shall establish the provider rates based on the calculation developed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section and shall update the rates on a regular basis.

The department shall include an explanation of the calculation of the provider rates in the report on CCCAP required pursuant to section 26.5-4-114, beginning with the report submitted on November 1, 2024, and in each subsequent report.

The department, working with early childhood councils as defined in section 26.5-2-202, county departments, and local coordinating organizations as defined in section 26.5-2-102 shall identify and recruit providers throughout the state to participate in the child care assistance program. In identifying and recruiting providers, the department and local coordinating organizations shall establish a mixed delivery system of public and private providers in communities throughout the state that enables parents to select CCCAP providers for their children from as broad a range as possible within their respective communities.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 667, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-2-803 as it existed prior to 2022.

26.5-4-110. Funding - allocation - maintenance of effort - allocation committee - rules.

There is created the child care assistance program allocation committee consisting of eleven members, eight of whom are appointed by a statewide association of counties and three of whom are appointed by the department. Of the members appointed by the statewide association of counties, at least two members must be from small or medium-sized counties and at least three must be from large counties, one appointee of whom must be a representative from the county that has the greatest percentage of the state's child care assistance program caseload. The appointing authorities shall consult with each other to ensure that the child care assistance program allocation committee is representative of the counties in the state. The child care assistance program allocation committee shall develop its own operational procedures.

Starting with the 2023-24 state fiscal year, and subject to available appropriations, the department, upon receiving recommendations from the child care assistance program allocation committee, shall annually establish the amount of each county's block grant for CCCAP based on an allocation formula agreed upon by the department and the child care assistance program allocation committee. Counties are only required to spend the state CCCAP allocation and the maintenance of effort for that allocation.

If the department and the child care assistance program allocation committee do not reach an agreement on the allocation formula on or before June 1 of a state fiscal year for the succeeding state fiscal year, the department and the child care assistance program allocation committee shall submit alternatives to the joint budget committee of the general assembly from which the joint budget committee shall select an allocation formula before the beginning of the succeeding state fiscal year.

The department, after input from the child care assistance program allocation committee, shall adopt rules regarding adjustments to the amount of a block grant, and the rules must address the following factors:

The cost of living;

The cost of high-quality early childhood programs;

The cost of programs;

The regional market rates or costs for CCCAP;

Drastic economic changes;

Geographic differences within a county; and

Other factors as determined by the child care assistance program allocation committee.

The money in a county block grant allocated to a county pursuant to this section must only be used for the provision of child care services pursuant to department rules promulgated pursuant to this part 1.

Money transferred from the county block grant temporary assistance for needy families program pursuant to section 26-2-714 (7) to the child care development fund may be used for child care quality improvement activities as identified in the federal "Child Care and Development Block Grant Act of 2014", 42 U.S.C. sec. 9858e, as amended.

For state fiscal year 2005-06 and for each state fiscal year thereafter, each county is required to meet a level of county spending for CCCAP that is equal to the county's proportionate share of the total county funds set forth in the annual general appropriation act for CCCAP for that state fiscal year. The level of county spending is known as the county's maintenance of effort for CCCAP for that state fiscal year. For any state fiscal year, the department is authorized to adjust a county's maintenance of effort, reflected as a percentage of the total county funds set forth in the annual general appropriation act for CCCAP for that state fiscal year, so that the percentage equals the county's proportionate share of the total state and federal funds appropriated for CCCAP for that state fiscal year. For any state fiscal year, the sum of all counties' maintenance of effort must be equal to or greater than the total county funds set forth in the general appropriation act for the state fiscal year 1996-97 for employment-related child care.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 668, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-2-804 as it existed prior to 2022.